apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="tog__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~ / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="klub__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~ben / ~ber / ~berne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ben</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ber</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>berne</l>     <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="ateist__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="residens__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~er / ~erne; Like ateist__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="verd/en__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~(en) / ~(e)ner / ~(e)nerne -->
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>enen</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ener</l>      <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ner</l>       <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>enerne</l>    <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>nerne</l>     <r>en<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="alibi__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="vindue__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>r</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>rne</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>

</pardef>

<pardef n="suffiks__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sgpl"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~et / ~er / ~erne; Like alibi__n but for lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>et</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>er</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>erne</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="spiller__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sgpl"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~e / ~ne -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ne</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sko__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ / ~ene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="laks__n" c="autoconcord:ut,sp"> <!-- Common; ~ / ~en / ~ / ~ene; Like sko__n, but with lemmas ending in 's' -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>en</l>        <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ene</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="glas__n" c="autoconcord:nt,sp"> <!-- Neuter; ~ / ~set / ~ / ~sene -->
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sp"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="apos__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>set</l>       <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>sene</l>      <r><s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="eks">             <i>eks</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="kasus">           <i>kasus</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="suffiks">         <i>suffiks</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="bygd">            <i>bygd</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="certifikat">      <i>certifikat</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="formering">       <i>formering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="haglgevær">       <i>haglgevær</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="kanton">          <i>kanton</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="kætteri">         <i>kætteri</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="mærkning">        <i>mærkning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="pergament">       <i>pergament</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="regulering">      <i>regulering</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="styresystem">     <i>styresystem</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="tilknytning">     <i>tilknytning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="verden">          <i>verd</i><par n="verd/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="indgriben">       <i>indgrib</i><par n="verd/en__n"/></e>
<e lm="kiks">            <i>kiks</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
 <e lm="album">           <i>album</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="anneks">          <i>anneks</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="apoteker">        <i>apoteker</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="fokus">           <i>fokus</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="plus">            <i>plus</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="minus">           <i>minus</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="filmmanus">       <i>filmmanus</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="es">              <i>es</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="avis">            <i>avis</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="sats" c="et sats i et væddemål"><i>sats</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="kløft">           <i>kløft</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="pas">             <i>pas</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="danseklub" a="PT" c="domain:fritid"><i>danseklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="gruseplads" a="PT"><i>gruseplads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="hestepasser" a="PT" c="domain:lantliv"><i>hestepasser</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="træsko" a="PT">   <i>træsko</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="bevis">           <i>bevis</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="blues">           <i>blues</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="boss">            <i>boss</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="cirkus">          <i>cirkus</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="dam">             <i>dam</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="dykker">          <i>dykker</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="essens">          <i>essens</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="fodboldklub">     <i>fodboldklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="gadesten">        <i>gadesten</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="gods">            <i>gods</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="golfklub">        <i>golfklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="has">             <i>has</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="hyldning">        <i>hyldning</i><par n="ateist__n"/></e>
<e lm="indbygger">       <i>indbygger</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="indgangsparti">   <i>indgangsparti</i><par n="alibi__n"/></e>
<e lm="klub">            <i>klub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="kompas">          <i>kompas</i><par n="glas__n"/></e>
<e lm="kongres">         <i>kongres</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="kors">            <i>kors</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="laks">            <i>laks</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="lyng">            <i>lyng</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="mus">             <i>mus</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="måler">           <i>måler</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="natklub">         <i>natklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="palads">          <i>palads</i><par n="suffiks__n"/></e>
<e lm="plads">           <i>plads</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
<e lm="pub">             <i>pub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="regn">            <i>regn</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="slags">           <i>slags</i><par n="laks__n"/></e>
<e lm="småfisk">         <i>småfisk</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="statsborger">     <i>statsborger</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="sten">            <i>sten</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="stub">            <i>stub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="supporterklub">   <i>supporterklub</i><par n="klub__n"/></e>
<e lm="tog">             <i>tog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
<e lm="pendultog">       <i>pendultog</i><par n="tog__n"/></e>
<e lm="torsk">           <i>torsk</i><par n="sko__n"/></e>
<e lm="urmager">         <i>urmager</i><par n="spiller__n"/></e>
<e lm="vindue">          <i>vindue</i><par n="vindue__n"/></e>
<e lm="vits">            <i>vits</i><par n="residens__n"/></e>
